Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-811
Second or subsequent violations; duty of Attorney General.

It shall be the duty of the Attorney General in such case, unless he or she is satisfied that such corporation, joint-stock company, limited liability company, or other association has desisted and abstained and will in the future desist and abstain from such violation, to enforce the provision by proceeding, either by information or by indictment, as he or she may in his or her discretion think best.

Laws 1905, c. 162, § 11, p. 640;

R.S.1913, § 4055;

C.S.1922, § 3458;

C.S.1929, § 59-811;

R.S.1943, § 59-811;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 366.